Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.131

Sale of out-of-state grade A milk and milk products.

Grade A milk and milk products from outside the state may not be sold in the state of Washington unless produced and/or pasteurized under provisions equivalent to the requirements of this chapter and the PMO: PROVIDED, That the director shall satisfy himself or herself that the authority having jurisdiction over the production and processing is properly enforcing such provisions.

[ 1994 c 143 s 211; 1961 c 11 s 15.36.500. Prior: 1949 c 168 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6266-39. Formerly RCW 15.36.500.]